Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB598.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Display of the Preamble Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School entity." A school district, joint school district, area career and technical school, intermediate unit, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school.Section 3. Display of the Preamble of the Constitution of the United States.(a) Duties.--The governing board of each school entity in this Commonwealth shall display the Preamble of the Constitution 123456789101112131415161718 of the United States at the entranceway of each school building.(b) Forms.--The display under subsection (a) shall take the form of, but is not limited to, a mounted plaque. The display under subsection (a) may include artwork as a result of a student contest, which may be prominently displayed in each school building.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0598PN0604 - 2 - 12345678